Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202660-3405
Lien; notice of violation of contract.

At the time an owner makes a vehicle available for use through a program and immediately prior to each time such owner offers such vehicle for use through such program, the program shall notify the owner that if the vehicle has a lien against it, the use of the vehicle through the program, including such use without physical damage insurance coverage, may violate the terms of the contract with the lienholder.

Laws 2024, LB1073, § 5.